lexc/noun/enhumagas.lexc
!!!enhu2.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§k§
§ooez3magas§ §uuemagas§ §EOAmagas§ §OEOE1magas§
§AE1magas§ §UUEmagas§ §OEOEmagas§ §UUE1magas§
§AEmagas§ §oeoez1magas§ §oooemagas§ §oeoez2magas§
§AAAmagas§ §oeoemagas§ §AAmagas§ §oeoezmagas§ §OEOE2magas§
§Jmagas§ §JPmagas§ §VVmagas§
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3magas§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOAmagas§st§uuemagas§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1magas§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1magas§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jmagas§§AE1magas§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUEmagas§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1magas§t§OEOEmagas§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jmagas§§UUE1magas§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPmagas§§AEmagas§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPmagas§§AEmagas§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPmagas§§AEmagas§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPmagas§§AEmagas§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPmagas§§AEmagas§it§OEOE2magas§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPmagas§§AEmagas§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1magas§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooemagas§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2magas§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAAmagas§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoemagas§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért                #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AAmagas§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooemagas§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uuemagas§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooemagas§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VVmagas§§AAAmagas§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként               #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AAmagas§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AAmagas§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VVmagas§§AAmagas§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0                  #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AAmagas§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezmagas§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig                 #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounoe
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possoe;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Pluroe;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famoe1;

LEXICON Possoe
+Dis:^+cDis^önként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^öst§uuemagas§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^öm   Famoe;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^öd   Famoe;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jmagas§§AE1magas§   Famoe;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUEmagas§nk   Famoe;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^ötök   Famoe;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jmagas§§UUE1magas§k   Famoe;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPmagas§§AEmagas§im   Famoe;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPmagas§§AEmagas§id   Famoe;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPmagas§§AEmagas§i   Famoe;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPmagas§§AEmagas§ink   Famoe;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPmagas§§AEmagas§it§OEOE2magas§k   Famoe;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPmagas§§AEmagas§ik   Famoe;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famoe1;

LEXICON Pluroe
+Plur:^+cPlur^ök    Genoe;
                            Genoe1;
        
LEXICON Famoe
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genoe;
                       Genoe;
LEXICON Famoe1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genoe;
                       Genoe1;

LEXICON Genoe
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Caseoe;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseoe;
                       Caseoe;
LEXICON Genoe1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Caseoe;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseoe;
                       Caseoe1;
 
LEXICON Caseoe
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooemagas§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2magas§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAAmagas§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoemagas§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért                #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AAmagas§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooemagas§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uuemagas§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooemagas§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VVmagas§§AAAmagas§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként               #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AAmagas§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AAmagas§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VVmagas§§AAmagas§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0                  #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AAmagas§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezmagas§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig                 #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Caseoe1
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooemagas§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^öt     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAAmagas§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^höz      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért                #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AAmagas§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooemagas§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uuemagas§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooemagas§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VVmagas§§AAAmagas§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként               #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AAmagas§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AAmagas§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VVmagas§§AAmagas§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0                  #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AAmagas§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^ön      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig                 #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Noun
KWord AddNounoe;
Pittsburgh AddNounoe;
Word AddNounoe;
ZENworks AddNounoe;
börtönmusical AddNoun;
charmeur AddNounoe;
gray AddNoun;
impregnálóspray AddNoun;
modellspray AddNoun;
rap AddNoun;
tisztítóspray AddNoun;
Abelné AddNoun;
Aggházyné AddNoun;
Albertné AddNoun;
Altdörferné AddNoun;
Andokné AddNoun;
Anonymusné AddNoun;
Arisztidné AddNoun;
Attiláné AddNoun;
Bacherné AddNoun;
Bajzáné AddNoun;
Balassáné AddNoun;
Banguiné AddNoun;
Barkóczyné AddNoun;
Bartuczné AddNoun;
Batsányiné AddNoun;
Bebritsné AddNoun;
Beksicsné AddNoun;
Benczúrné AddNoun;
Benyovszkyné AddNoun;
Berenténé AddNoun;
Bernárdfyné AddNoun;
Beszené AddNoun;
Bigéné AddNoun;
Bittnerné AddNoun;
Bodrogolasziné AddNoun;
Bokené AddNoun;
Bonipertné AddNoun;
Borsayné AddNoun;
Bourbonné AddNoun;
Brestyánszkyné AddNoun;
Bruminé AddNoun;
Buczyné AddNoun;
Bunkóné AddNoun;
Bánhegyiné AddNoun;
Báthoriné AddNoun;
Béláné AddNoun;
Bödéné AddNoun;
Celesztinné AddNoun;
Chyzerné AddNoun;
Csabaszabadiné AddNoun;
Csekné AddNoun;
Cseterkiné AddNoun;
Csizmarekné AddNoun;
Csutakné AddNoun;
Csíkné AddNoun;
Czeitlerné AddNoun;
Czinderné AddNoun;
Cörverné AddNoun;
Dapsyné AddNoun;
Degréné AddNoun;
Descartesné AddNoun;
Dickné AddNoun;
Dnyeperné AddNoun;
Dolinayné AddNoun;
Dorfmeisterné AddNoun;
Drávaiványiné AddNoun;
Duschekné AddNoun;
Dévicsné AddNoun;
Dürerné AddNoun;
Egonné AddNoun;
Elekné AddNoun;
Endlicherné AddNoun;
Erikné AddNoun;
Ethernetné AddNoun;
Facsinayné AddNoun;
Faustné AddNoun;
Fejérváryné AddNoun;
Fenyvesné AddNoun;
Fesztyné AddNoun;
Filepné AddNoun;
Fluglerné AddNoun;
Forrainé AddNoun;
Friebeiszné AddNoun;
Futakyné AddNoun;
Fórisné AddNoun;
Gabelhoferné AddNoun;
Galánthayné AddNoun;
Gecserné AddNoun;
Gercsényiné AddNoun;
Gertingerné AddNoun;
Gidáné AddNoun;
Gluzekné AddNoun;
Gombosné AddNoun;
Grantnerné AddNoun;
Gräflné AddNoun;
Gusztinyiné AddNoun;
Gyenisné AddNoun;
Gyömreiné AddNoun;
Gálfiné AddNoun;
Géberné AddNoun;
Görgényiné AddNoun;
Hagymáné AddNoun;
Hallóssyné AddNoun;
Hamvayné AddNoun;
Haraszthyné AddNoun;
Haselbeckné AddNoun;
Hegedüsné AddNoun;
Heiszlerné AddNoun;
Henrikné AddNoun;
Hermanné AddNoun;
Hidasné AddNoun;
Hirschné AddNoun;
Hofhauserné AddNoun;
Honfiné AddNoun;
Horvayné AddNoun;
Hudacsekné AddNoun;
Háriné AddNoun;
Hölblingné AddNoun;
Igmándyné AddNoun;
Imréné AddNoun;
Istvánné AddNoun;
Jakabné AddNoun;
Jenőné AddNoun;
Jungferné AddNoun;
Járainé AddNoun;
Józsáné AddNoun;
Kalapácsné AddNoun;
Kanászné AddNoun;
Karlovszkyné AddNoun;
Kaszáné AddNoun;
Keczkésné AddNoun;
Kenczlerné AddNoun;
Keresztúryné AddNoun;
Kesztyűsné AddNoun;
Kinizsiné AddNoun;
Kispéterné AddNoun;
Klimmné AddNoun;
Knöpflerné AddNoun;
Kohánné AddNoun;
Komenskyné AddNoun;
Kondásné AddNoun;
Kormányné AddNoun;
Kosné AddNoun;
Koyné AddNoun;
Kreithné AddNoun;
Kriszticsné AddNoun;
Krüzselyiné AddNoun;
Kunstaedterné AddNoun;
Kuvaitné AddNoun;
Kántorné AddNoun;
Kékvölgyiné AddNoun;
Kölesné AddNoun;
Kövesiné AddNoun;
Kőszeginé AddNoun;
Lajcsiné AddNoun;
Lampérthné AddNoun;
Laufenaunerné AddNoun;
Lehotayné AddNoun;
Lersné AddNoun;
Lidlné AddNoun;
Linnéné AddNoun;
Littkené AddNoun;
Lotené AddNoun;
Lukovszkyné AddNoun;
Lánghyné AddNoun;
Lóczyné AddNoun;
Machiavelliné AddNoun;
Magyariné AddNoun;
Makayné AddNoun;
Mannheimerné AddNoun;
Mariházyné AddNoun;
Marxné AddNoun;
Mauthnerné AddNoun;
Megyericseiné AddNoun;
Mendlikné AddNoun;
Mesterházyné AddNoun;
Mihályné AddNoun;
Miletzné AddNoun;
Miskolcziné AddNoun;
Mohácsné AddNoun;
Morbitzerné AddNoun;
Munkácsyné AddNoun;
Mákné AddNoun;
Márkusné AddNoun;
Méhesné AddNoun;
Mórné AddNoun;
Nagelné AddNoun;
Nagyváthyné AddNoun;
Neményiné AddNoun;
Noffryné AddNoun;
Nyergesné AddNoun;
Nyírvasváriné AddNoun;
Némethné AddNoun;
Olcsvaapátiné AddNoun;
Orlainé AddNoun;
Oszkárné AddNoun;
Pacsuné AddNoun;
Palotayné AddNoun;
Partosné AddNoun;
Patkóné AddNoun;
Pavelné AddNoun;
Pepsiné AddNoun;
Pethené AddNoun;
Petróné AddNoun;
Pichlerné AddNoun;
Piókerné AddNoun;
Poldininé AddNoun;
Poppelné AddNoun;
Posztóczkyné AddNoun;
Prinzné AddNoun;
Pulayné AddNoun;
Pákhné AddNoun;
Pártayné AddNoun;
Péterfiné AddNoun;
Quirinné AddNoun;
Raffelsbergerné AddNoun;
Ranolderné AddNoun;
Reichenhallerné AddNoun;
Rellené AddNoun;
Retzlerné AddNoun;
Riegerné AddNoun;
Rippl-Rónainé AddNoun;
Rokolyáné AddNoun;
Rosznágelné AddNoun;
Rubensné AddNoun;
Rusztemné AddNoun;
Rátkayné AddNoun;
Réthiné AddNoun;
Röckné AddNoun;
Santelliné AddNoun;
Schaurekné AddNoun;
Scherné AddNoun;
Schlickné AddNoun;
Schnitzlné AddNoun;
Schréterné AddNoun;
Schwarzeneggerné AddNoun;
Schöpfné AddNoun;
Selmecziné AddNoun;
Serényiné AddNoun;
Sillayné AddNoun;
Sinkáné AddNoun;
Solymosyné AddNoun;
Sonkolyné AddNoun;
Spielenbergné AddNoun;
Steinerné AddNoun;
Stobbené AddNoun;
Stöckelné AddNoun;
Szabiné AddNoun;
Szalainé AddNoun;
Szapolyainé AddNoun;
Szederné AddNoun;
Szenczeiné AddNoun;
Szijjné AddNoun;
Szodorayné AddNoun;
Száhlenderné AddNoun;
Szőgyényné AddNoun;
Sódarné AddNoun;
Tanárkyné AddNoun;
Temesváryné AddNoun;
Thoroczkayné AddNoun;
Tolnainé AddNoun;
Tróznerné AddNoun;
Tátrayné AddNoun;
Udvaryné AddNoun;
Vachottné AddNoun;
Vastagné AddNoun;
Vernené AddNoun;
Vincéné AddNoun;
Vámossyné AddNoun;
Wallaszkyné AddNoun;
Weltnerné AddNoun;
Wildnerné AddNoun;
Zacherné AddNoun;
Zimmerné AddNoun;
Zsitvayné AddNoun;
boszorkányné AddNoun;
főgépészné AddNoun;
juhászné AddNoun;
kőművesné AddNoun;
parasztné AddNoun;
szultánné AddNoun;
vetélytársné AddNoun;
Éduáné AddNoun;
őrnagyné AddNoun;
